Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-814.01
Search warrant; issuance on affidavit; procedure.

A search warrant may be issued under section 29-814.04 pursuant to written affidavit sworn to before a magistrate, a judge, or any other person authorized to administer oaths under the laws of this state by the person making it. Such affidavit shall particularly describe the persons or places to be searched and the persons or property to be seized. Such affidavit shall set forth the facts and circumstances tending to show that such person or property is in the place, or the property is in the possession of the person, to be searched. Such affidavit may be submitted to the magistrate or judge in person or by facsimile or other electronic means and the warrant may be issued to the affiant in person or by facsimile or other electronic means.

Laws 1980, LB 731, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 20.

It is well established that affidavits for search warrants must be tested and interpreted in a common-sense and realistic fashion. Where the circumstances are detailed and reasons for crediting a source of information are given resulting in a finding of probable cause by the magistrate, the court should not invalidate the warrant by interpreting the affidavit in a hyper-technical manner and should find it sufficient if it will support the issuance of a warrant after the deletion of any inaccurate statements. State v. Longa, 211 Neb. 356, 318 N.W.2d 733 (1982).